src/morfo.EN.foma
# English Morphological Analyzer
# ==============================
# This is the component of the pipeline that analyzes English words based on a
# number of open-class word lists, present in the directory `data/EN/OP/`.
#
# The analysis is done with [Penn Treebank-style tags](http://www.comp.leeds.ac.uk/amalgam/tagsets/upenn.html).

# Numerals
# --------
# Numbers written with letters are a closed class, so they're automatically
# detected by the script composed by the makefile. Numbers written with digits
# are open class, and we detect them with this regex. This is a bit of a lenient
# regex, since it doesn't care whether commas or dots are being used to separate
# thousands or decimals. However, since the input is already tokenized, it is
# better to recognize any such sequence as a number.
define Digit [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define Number [Digit* [(%.|%,) Digit+]*] "+CD":0;

# Nouns
# -----
# Noun lexemes are loaded from the corresponding file, and then the
# pluralization morpheme is added. A morpheme boundary symbol `%^` is inserted,
# to let rewrite rules handle inter-morpheme phonology.
#
# Nouns with irregular plurals bypass the suffix with the priority union
# operator (`.P.`). A few are listed here, and adding more would be a matter of
# just writing them in. Nouns that can form the plural both ways are also
# included.
define NLex @txt"data/EN/OP/NN.txt";

define NSuf "+NN":0 | "+NNS":[%^ s];

define NIrreg [{goose} "+NNS"]:{geese}
            | [{mouse} "+NNS"]:{mice}
            | [{sheep} "+NNS"]:{sheep}
            ;
define NBoth [{cactus} "+NNS"]:{cacti}
           | [{virus} "+NNS"]:{viri}
           ;
define Noun NIrreg .P. [NBoth | NLex NSuf];

# Verbs
# -----
# Verbs have more forms than nouns, and a tag is assigned to each of them. Each
# has its own specific morpheme, but a lot of irregularities also exist. As
# before, only a few are listed here. However, there is an example of a verb with
# only one irregular form (_speak_, _spoke_), a verb with two identical forms
# (_say_, _said_ both as past and past participle), and a highly irregular verb
# (_to be_).
#
# Expanding the list would only require adding the irregularities desired in
# the variable `VIrreg`. In a more serious endeavour to write an English
# analyzer, a better formalism (for example continuation classes, such as in
# `lexc`) might be more appropriate and comfortable to use.
define VLex @txt"data/EN/OP/VB.txt";

define VSuf "+VB":0 | "+VBZ":[%^ s] | "+VBG":[%^ i n g]
          | "+VBD":[%^ e d] | "+VBN":[%^ e n]
          ;
define VIrreg [{say} "+VBD"]:{said}
            | [{say} "+VBN"]:{said}
            | [{be} "+VBD"]:{was}
            | [{be} "+VBZ"]:{is}
            | [{be} "+VBP"]:{am}
            | [{be} "+VBP"]:{are}
            | [{be} "+VBN"]:{been}
            | [{speak} "+VBD"]:{spoke}
            ;
define Verb VIrreg .P. VLex VSuf;

# Adjectives & Adverbs
# --------------------
# Adjectives and adverbs have very similary morphology, with comparative and
# superlative forms made with the same suffixes. Of course, a syntactic analyzer
# might find these forms made with the words "more" and "most", but this is a
# word-by-word morphological analyzer, so that case is not studied. It is to be
# noted, though, that a perhaps more clever tokenizer might recognize multiword
# expressions, which then would give the analyzer more flexibility for some
# cases.
define JLex @txt"data/EN/OP/JJ.txt";

define JSuf "+JJ":0 | "+JJR":[%^ e r] | "+JJS":[%^ e s t];

define JIrreg [{good} "+JJR"]:{better}
            | [{good} "+JJS"]:{best}
            | [{bad} "+JJR"]:{worse}
            | [{bad} "+JJS"]:{worst}
            ;
define Adjective JIrreg .P. JLex JSuf;

define RBLex @txt"data/EN/OP/RB.txt";

define RBSuf "+RB":0 | "+RBR":[%^ e r] | "+RBS":[%^ e s t];

define Adverb RBLex RBSuf;

# Lexicon
# -------
# The lexicon is just the possible words that we are going to recognize, with
# suffixes appended.
define Lexicon Number
             | Adverb
             | Noun
             | Verb
             | Adjective
             ;

# Ortographic rules
# -----------------
# The lexicon is then passed through ortographic rewrite rules, which take care
# of morpheme boundary phenomena. This include deletion (`-> 0`), insertion
# (`[..] ->`, where `[..]` represents an empty transition, but only one), and
# transformation. Finally the morpheme boundary indicators are dropped.
regex Lexicon
  .o. e -> 0 || _ %^ [e|i]
  .o. y -> i || _ %^ e
  .o. y -> i e || _ %^ s
  .o. [..] -> e || [s|z|x|{ch}|{sh}] _ %^ s
  .o. %^ -> 0;
